Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5210
Board; annual report.

The board shall submit an annual report of the activities and actions
of the board for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor, the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst, and the Clerk of the Legislature by December 1. The report submitted to the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Each
member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by request to the chairperson of the board. Each report shall include
the following information:

(1) A complete operating and financial statement for the board for the
prior fiscal year;

(2) The number of qualified beginning farmers and livestock producers
receiving assistance from the board;

(3) The number of owners of agricultural assets claiming tax credits
and the monetary amount of credits granted by the board; and

(4) Any other relevant information which the board deems necessary to
report.

No information furnished to the board shall be disclosed in the report
in such a way as to reveal information from a tax return of any person.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1223, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 141.